Louisiana, session 2026, HB792.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:831.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§831.1. Infectious diseases; screening program
A.(1) The department shall establish a program that provides standardized
screening procedures for inmates who are housed at any correctional facility within
this state for the purpose of identifying infection with the human immunodeficiency
virus (HIV) and the hepatitis C virus.
(2) An inmate may decline participation in the screening procedures. Any
refusal shall be documented in the medical record of the inmate and shall not affect
the inmate's classification status, privileges, or eligibility for services.
B. For purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-955 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 792
(1) "Correctional facility" means any facility operated by or under the
jurisdiction of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections.
(2) "Department" means the Department of Public Safety and Corrections.
(3) "Inmate" means any person incarcerated or detained in a correctional
facility or parish prison or jail within this state, regardless of conviction status.
(4) "Screening procedures" means the evaluation or laboratory-based testing
conducted in accordance with established medical standards to determine infection
with HIV or the hepatitis C virus.
C.(1) Each correctional facility shall implement the screening procedures for
any inmate who is expected to remain incarcerated for at least seventy-two hours or
who is otherwise deemed clinically appropriate for testing.
(2) Each parish prison or jail may implement the screening procedures and
shall be reimbursed pursuant to Subsection F of this Section. No parish prison or jail
is required to implement any screening procedures without a specific appropriation
of funds by the legislature for this purpose.
D. Screening procedures shall be conducted at the intake of the inmate or as
soon as reasonably practicable after incarceration. Confirmatory testing shall be
conducted in accordance with established medical standards. Reflex testing
protocols shall be utilized, when available, to minimize duplicative laboratory
procedures. For purposes of this Subsection, "reflex testing" means a laboratory
protocol where an initial, preliminary screening test automatically triggers
confirmatory testing.
E.(1) The department shall ensure that any medically indicated treatment
based on a positive test obtained pursuant to this Section is funded, to the extent
permitted by state and federal law, through any of the following:
(a) State appropriations.
(b) Existing pharmaceutical subscription agreements.
(c) Medicaid, if the inmate is eligible and federal law permits coverage.
(d) Any other available federal funding source.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-955 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 792
(2) No parish governing authority or sheriff shall be financially responsible
for the cost of antiviral or antiretroviral medications that are prescribed based on a
positive test obtained pursuant to this Section.
(3) All test results and medical records obtained pursuant to this Section
shall remain confidential as medical information and shall not be disclosed except
in accordance with applicable state and federal privacy laws. Information obtained
pursuant to this Section shall be used solely for medical and public health purposes.
F.(1) The department shall reimburse the sheriff or parish governing
authority for each inmate that is screened at any participating parish jail or prison
pursuant to this Section.
(2) Reimbursement rates include but are not limited to costs associated with
all of the following:
(a) Laboratory services.
(b) Phlebotomy supplies.
(c) Administrative reporting.
(d) Medical evaluation necessary for treatment initiation.
(3) Reimbursements shall be made within sixty days of the submission of
proper documentation and shall be subject to available appropriations.
(4) The department may establish performance-based incentives that are
associated with compliance rates for screening procedures.
G.(1) The initiation of treatment in parish prisons or jails may be prioritized
for any of the following inmates:
(a) Those reasonably expected to remain in custody for a duration sufficient
to complete therapy.
(b) Those under the custody of the department.
(c) Those with advanced clinical staging.
(2) An inmate who is not initiated on treatment while incarcerated shall
receive a documented referral and discharge planning to ensure continuity of care.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-955 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 792
H. The department shall submit an annual report to the House Committee on
Administration of Criminal Justice and the Senate Committee on Judiciary C no later
than March first of each year. The report shall include all of the following:
(1) The number of inmates screened by the department and at each
participating parish prison or jail.
(2) The number of inmates who tested positive for HIV or hepatitis C.
(3) The number of inmates who received treatment.
(4) The number of treatment completion rates.
(5) The estimated fiscal impact of the screening procedures.
I. The department may promulgate rules in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Section.
Section 2. R.S. 44:4.1(B)(8) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4.1. Exceptions
* * *
B. The legislature further recognizes that there exist exceptions, exemptions,
and limitations to the laws pertaining to public records throughout the revised
statutes and codes of this state. Therefore, the following exceptions, exemptions, and
limitations are hereby continued in effect by incorporation into this Chapter by
citation:
* * *
(8) R.S. 15:242, 440.6, 440.8, 477.2, 549, 570, 574.12, 574.12.1, 578.1, 587,
587.1.2, 616, 660, 831.1(E), 840.1, 1176, 1204.1, 1212.1(E), 1507
* * *
Section 3. The provisions of this Act applicable to parish prisons and jails shall be
subject to the appropriation of funds by the legislature for this purpose.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2027.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-955 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 792